Maryland, session 2026, SB0965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 8–1006 and 8–1007 of Article – Transportation of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 8–1007 and 8–1008, respectively.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0965*

SENATE BILL 965
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
8–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Coordinator” means the individual designated by the Department to oversee
the implementation of Vision Zero throughout the State.
(c) “Vision Zero” means a program for planning and developing a State roadway
system that has zero vehicle–related deaths or serious injuries.
8–1002.
There is a program within the Department known as Vision Zero.
8–1003.
(a) The purpose of Vision Zero is to develop strategies to make roadways safer for
drivers and passengers of motor vehicles, bicyclists, and pedestrians.
(b) The goal of Vision Zero is to have zero vehicle–related deaths or serious
injuries on roadways by the year 2030.
8–1006.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED
TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS THAT IMPLEMENT:
(1) TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER §
21–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) AUTOMATED RAILROAD GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–704.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERAS UNDER § 21–706.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(4) STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–707.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(5) SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–809 OF THIS ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 965 3
(6) WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–810 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(7) BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–1134 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(8) NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 22–612 OF
THIS ARTICLE;
(9) VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 24–111.3 OF
THIS ARTICLE; OR
(10) ANY OTHER COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED TRAFFIC
ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW.
(B) EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT
PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT A QUARTERLY REPORT TO THE COORDINATOR STATING,
FOR EACH CITATION ISSUED DURING THE APPLICABLE QUARTER TO A MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE:
(1) THE REGISTRATION PLATE NUMBER AND STATE OF
REGISTRATION;
(2) WHETHER THE CITATION HAS BEEN PAID; AND
(3) WHETHER THE CITATION IS PAST DUE.
(C) EACH QUARTERLY REPORT SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION FOR THE PREVIOUS QUARTER;
(2) UPDATE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED IN PREVIOUS QUARTERLY
REPORTS TO REFLECT CITATIONS THAT HAVE BEEN SUBSEQUENTLY PAID AND ARE
NO LONGER CONSIDERED PAST DUE; AND
(3) PROVIDE A CUMULATIVE SUMMARY OF:
(I) CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THE PROGRAM TO MOTOR
VEHICLES REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE;
(II) THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS THAT HAVE BEEN PAID; AND
(III) THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS THAT ARE PAST DUE.

SENATE BILL 965
(D) THE COORDINATOR SHALL COLLABORATE WITH COUNTY AND
MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.